District of Columbia statutes.
2-1802.04

Final decision.

(a)

Except as provided in Chapter 18A of this title, the order of the administrative law judge or attorney examiner shall become final 15 calendar days after service of the order upon the respondent, unless within that time the party files an administrative appeal pursuant to subchapter III of this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may prepare a list of delinquent respondents who have not paid or appealed, within 15 days of service, fines, penalties, costs, and interests resulting from final orders, and may periodically publish the list in one or more general circulation newspapers published in the District of Columbia.

Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 204, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(j), 38 DCR 314
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 105(c), 48 DCR 1888
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 9(c), 52 DCR 2638

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2714.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-281 rewrote subsec. (b) which had read:
“(b) The Mayor may prepare a listing of delinquent respondents who have not paid or appealed within 15 days of service, fines, penalties, or costs resulting from final decisions issued by attorney examiners and may periodically publish such a list in one or more general circulation newspapers published in the District of Columbia.”
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (a), substituted “Except as provided in § 2-1831.03(f)), the” for “The”.

Effect of Amendments